Hawaii statutes.
§508D-14 Additional disclosure
requirements. The requirements of this chapter are in addition to all
other disclosure obligations of the seller required by law relating to the sale
of residential real property. [L 1994, c 214, pt of §2; am L 1996, c 161, §14;
am L 2001, c 224, pt of §7]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next